Maryland, session 2025, SB0089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–206.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH A PROCESS IN COLLABORATION
WITH ONE OR MORE BOARDS UNDER THE DEPARTMENT’S DIRECTION AND CONTROL
THAT REQUIRES A BOARD TO INCLUDE A NOTATION INDICATING VETERAN STATUS
ON A PROFESSIONAL LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE AND TO ASSIST IN DETERMINING
ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE AND FEDERAL VETERANS BENEFITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION.
(B) IF THE DEPARTMENT ESTABLISHES THE PROCESS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, AN APPLICATION FOR A PROFESSIONAL LICENSE
OR CERTIFICATE SHALL ALLOW AN APPLICANT TO:
(1) PRESENT A CERTIFICATION OF VETERAN STATUS OBTAINED
FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 9–905 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A DD FORM 214, OR OTHER
DOCUMENTATION ACCEPTABLE TO THE BOARD CERTIFYING VETERAN STATUS; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 249 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) INDICATE THAT THE APPLICANT CONSENTS TO:
(I) HAVING A NOTATION ON THE APPLICANT’S PROFESSIONAL
LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE INDICATING THAT THE APPLICANT IS A VETERAN; AND
(II) BEING CONTACTED BY APPROPRIATE EXECUTIVE BRANCH
AGENCIES REGARDING THE APPLICANT’S ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE OR FEDERAL
VETERANS BENEFITS.
(C) IF AN APPLICANT PRESENTS THE REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION AND
CONSENTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A BOARD
SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE ON THE APPLICANT’S PROFESSIONAL LICENSE OR
CERTIFICATE A NOTATION INDICATING THAT THE APPLICANT IS A VETERAN; AND
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 4–304 THROUGH 4–325 OF THE
GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE AND ANY OTHER APPLICABLE LAW, AND ON
REQUEST FROM AN EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY, ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMIT TO
THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY APPROPRIATE INFORMATION ABOUT THE
APPLICANT RELEVANT TO DETERMINING THE APPLICANT’S ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE
OR FEDERAL VETERANS BENEFITS.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT AND APPLICABLE BOARDS MAY ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –